Hawaii statutes.
[§342P-8 Asbestos and lead abatement
special fund.] (a) There is established within the department of health
an asbestos and lead abatement special fund into which shall be
deposited all moneys collected from fees for permits, licenses, inspections, certificates,
notifications, variances, investigations, and reviews.

(b) Moneys in the asbestos and lead abatement
special fund shall be expended by the department to:

(1) Partially fund the operating costs of the
asbestos and lead abatement program's mandated activities and functions;

(2) Fund statewide education, demonstration, and
outreach programs;

(3) Provide for the accreditation of training
programs;

(4) Provide training opportunities to ensure the
maintenance of professional competence among staff and administrators; and

(5) Plan for future growth and expansion to meet
emerging needs. [L 1998, c 242, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next